Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 30. State Construction Department

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 105, §
5, makes the act effective July 1, 2016.

§ 9-2-3001.
State construction department created; definitions.

There is created the state construction department.

As used in this article:

“Agency” means any school district, state office, department, board, council, commission, separate operating agency, institution or other instrumentality or operating unit of the state excluding the University of Wyoming, the Wyoming business council and the Wyoming department of transportation. “Agency” shall include a Wyoming community college if the community college is conducting a capital construction project using state funds that requires approval by the community college commission or authorization by the legislature under W.S. 21-18-205(g);

“Capital construction project” means new construction, demolition, renovation and capital renewal of or to any public building or facility and any other public improvement necessary for the public building or facility, major maintenance as defined in W.S. 16-6-101(a)(v) and major building and facility repair and replacement as defined in W.S. 21-15-109(a)(iii);

“Competitive negotiation” means to negotiate for a contract through a request for proposals process or any other similar competitive selection process;

“Department” means the state construction department;

“Informalities or irregularities in any bid” includes:

Ambiguity as to any part of a bid;

A missing unit bid price;

An erasure or change in a unit bid price not initialed in ink by the bidder.

“Principal representative” means the governing board of an agency or its designated representative or, if there is no governing board, the executive head of an agency. When applicable, “principal representative” shall include the University of Wyoming board of trustees or its designated representative;

“State procurement website” means a website that the department designates to host information and notices related to procurement under this article.

History.

2016 ch. 105, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2020 ch. 29, § 2, effective October 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective October 1, 2020, added (b).

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 105, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2016.

§ 9-2-3002.
Department divisions.

The department shall consist of the following divisions:

State construction management division;

School facilities division;

Operations division.

History.

2016 ch. 105, § 2, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 2, § 1, effective March 7, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

added (a)(iii).

Laws 2018, ch. 2, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 105, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2016.

§ 9-2-3003.
Director and division administrators; appointment; removal.

The governor shall appoint a director of the department with the advice and consent of the senate.

With the approval of the governor, the director may appoint administrators for the divisions established by W.S. 9-2-3002(a)(i) and (ii). The governor may remove the director and division administrators as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The director’s and administrator’s salaries shall be determined by the governor.

The director shall be the chief administrative officer of the department with general supervision and control of all activities, functions and employees of the department. He shall devote his entire time to the performance and supervision of the duties conferred on him by law. The director may:

Employ professional, technical and other assistants to work in the department, along with other employees necessary to carry out the purpose of this article;

Formulate the policies and programs to be carried out by the department through its respective divisions;

Authorize a designee to carry out any duties assigned, unless specifically precluded from doing so by law.

History.

2016 ch. 105, § 2, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 2, § 1, effective March 7, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (b), substituted “for the divisions established by W.S. 9-2-3002(a)(i) and (ii). The governor” for “for each of the divisions. The governor.”

Laws 2018, ch. 2, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 105, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2016.

§ 9-2-3004.
Duties of the department.

The department shall staff the state building commission as provided in W.S.

9-5-101

through

9-5-108

, and as required by the commission unless staffing of the commission is otherwise specified by law. The administrator of the state construction management division shall function as secretary to the state building commission and the department shall administratively implement the commission’s rules relating to the state capital construction.

The department shall staff the school facilities commission as provided in title 21 of the Wyoming statutes, and as required by the commission unless staffing of the commission is otherwise specified by law. The administrator of the school facilities division shall function as secretary to the school facilities commission and the department shall administratively implement the commission’s rules.

The department shall:

Review and make recommendations to the governor concerning capital construction budget requests made by the state building commission, school facilities commission, the University of Wyoming, community college commission and any agency;

Adopt rules governing procurement for capital construction projects pursuant to W.S.

9-2-3006

. Wyoming community colleges shall adhere to the rules for any capital construction project using state funds that requires approval by the community college commission or authorization by the legislature under W.S. 21-18-205(g). The University of Wyoming may adhere to the rules to the extent feasible, as determined by the university. The university and Wyoming community colleges shall adhere to any other capital construction requirement specified by law;

For the procurement of capital construction projects, be authorized to accept the recommendations of agencies on the award or rejection and readvertisement of bids based upon the qualifications and responsibilities of bidders;

Oversee bonding for the procurement of capital construction projects. Bidders shall provide a bond or other form of guarantee satisfactory to the state of Wyoming as hereafter provided:

A bid bond or other form of bid guarantee satisfactory to the state may be required in an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the aggregate amount of the bid or contract when a contract to be awarded under the solicitation is expected to exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00). The bond may be provided by a surety company authorized to do business in the state of Wyoming;

A bid bond or other form of bid guarantee satisfactory to the state may be retained by the state as surety throughout the term of the awarded contract provided the amount of the contract is less than or equal to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00);

Before any contract for a capital construction project is awarded to any person, the person shall furnish to the state a performance and payment bond or other form of guarantee in accordance with the standards and monetary limits provided in W.S.

16-6-112

;

This paragraph does not limit the authority of the state to require a performance bond or other security in addition to bonds, or in circumstances other than the circumstances specified by this subsection;

The department may accept bids submitted by persons who combine their bonding capacity in any way so as to meet the bonding requirements of this paragraph.

Provide the appropriate staff to serve as staff of the state building commission in carrying out the duties of the department under this article and construction management functions under W.S.

9-5-101

through

9-5-108

;

Plan for all construction projects in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

9-5-107

,

9-5-108

and rules, procedures and criteria adopted pursuant to those sections;

Adopt reasonable rules and regulations pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to administer this article;

Review the final design, drawings and plans of any capital construction project prior to commencing with bidding to ensure that energy efficient best practice techniques and processes are included in the design of any capital construction project funded with federal funds and for which the state is required to expend state funds to fully or partially pay for operations, routine maintenance or major maintenance expenses for the facility. Upon conclusion of each review, the department shall submit a report of findings to the joint appropriations committee and the joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim committee.

Administer the Professional Architectural, Engineering and Land Surveying Services Procurement Act.

History.

2016 ch. 105, § 2, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 136, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 134, § 1, effective February 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 29, § 2, effective October 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 30, § 1, effective October 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (c)(viii).

The 2019 amendment,

in (c)(iv)(B), substituted "or equal to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)" for "twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00)," and in (c)(iv)(C), substituted "fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)" for "twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00)."

Laws 2019, ch. 134 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2019.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 29, § 2, effective October 1, 2020, in (c)(i), substituted “any agency” for “any state agency”; in (c)(ii), substituted “Adopt rules governing procurement for capital construction projects pursuant to W.S.

9-2-3006

. Wyoming community colleges shall adhere to the rules for any capital construction project using state funds that requires approval by the community college commission or authorization by the legislature under W.S. 21-18-205(g)” for “Adopt capital construction procurement policies and standards and ensure compliance with the policies and standards by state agencies and school districts using any state funds for capital construction projects,” “and may adhere to the rules” for “and Wyoming community colleges may adhere to the standards and policies,” and “university” for “university or affected college”; in (c)(iii), substituted “procurement of capital construction projects” for “procurement of construction of public projects, facilities or structures”; and in (c)(iv)(A), substituted “one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00)” for “one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00).”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 30, § 1, effective October 1, 2020, added (c)(ix).

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, rewrote (c)(iv)(C), which read “Before any contract exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) in amount, for the construction, alteration or repair of any public building or public work or improvement of the state is awarded to any person, the person shall furnish to the state a performance and payment bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the state of Wyoming or other form of surety satisfactory to the state, in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the contract price.”

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 105, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2016.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 134 § 2, provides: "This act shall apply only to procurement activities initiated on or after the effective date of this act."

§ 9-2-3005.
Department budget.

The department shall develop and use a standard budget, base budget and exception budget as provided in W.S.

9-2-1010

through

9-2-1014

.

through (f) Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 2, § 2.

History.

2016 ch. 105, § 2, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 2, §§
1, 2, effective March 7, 2018.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 2, § 1, in (a), substituted “department shall develop and use a standard” for “department shall not develop or use a standard,” “in W.S.

9-2-1010

through” for “in W.S.

9-2-1002

through,” and deleted the last three sentences, which read: “The department of administration and information budget division shall transmit on or before August 15 of each odd numbered year, to the state construction department its budget as approved by the legislature for the previous biennium. The director of the department shall develop an estimated budget for the subsequent fiscal biennium by revising the current budget, taking into account the duties and functions of the department and the most efficient means of performing those duties and functions and prepare and submit to the department of administration and information an estimated budget for the subsequent fiscal biennium. The estimated budget shall identify differences from the current budget, itemizing and explaining in writing the reason for each change.”

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 2, § 2, repealed former (b) through (f).

Laws 2018, ch. 2, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2018.

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 105, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2016.

§ 9-2-3006.
Procurement for capital construction projects.

Contracts for capital construction projects let by an agency or the University of Wyoming, excluding contracts for professional services under W.S.

9-23-101

through

9-23-107

and for capital construction projects delivered through alternate design and construction delivery methods as defined in W.S. 16-6-701(a)(v), shall be let through the use of competitive negotiation, noncompetitive negotiation or competitive sealed bidding as follows:

For any contract with an estimated value equal to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or less, the contract shall be let in accordance with the following:

Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the contract shall be let by competitive negotiation. In conducting the competitive negotiation, the agency or the university shall solicit not less than three (3) independent cost estimates or proposals prior to letting the contract;

If the principal representative of an agency or the university determines competitive negotiation is not feasible, the contract may be let by noncompetitive negotiation;

The contract shall be let to a resident of the state in accordance with W.S. 16-6-102(a).

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection, for any contract with an estimated value in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), the contract shall be let in accordance with the following:

The contract shall be let by competitive sealed bidding. The agency or the university shall give notice of the opportunity to bid on the contract on the state procurement website for not less than two (2) consecutive weeks. The notice shall contain a general description of the proposed contract and shall indicate the procedures by which interested persons may apply for consideration;

The contract shall be let to a responsible bidder making the lowest bid except that the contract shall be let to the responsible certified resident making the lowest bid if the certified resident’s bid is not more than five percent (5%) higher than that of the lowest responsible nonresident bidder in accordance with W.S. 16-6-102(a).

If the principal representative of an agency determines that the use of competitive sealed bidding is not feasible or practical, the principal representative shall submit a written determination to the department. If approved by the department, the contract may be let by competitive negotiation. If competitive negotiation is not feasible or practical, the principal representative shall submit a written determination to the governor. If approved by the governor or the governor’s designee the contract may be let by noncompetitive negotiation. Contracts by the university may be let by competitive negotiation or noncompetitive negotiation in accordance with university regulations;

The director of the department, upon a written finding that it would be more efficient to use federal procurement procedures for capital construction contracts let by the Wyoming military department concerning state owned properties under the control of the adjutant general, may authorize federal procurement procedures instead of the procedures required under this subsection.

The department shall adopt standard forms and procedures for the procurement of capital construction projects by an agency in accordance with this section.

Any contract by an agency for a capital construction project in an amount exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) shall require the approval of the governor or the governor’s designee prior to state commitment.

Any contract let under this section shall be in accordance with the applicable contracting and residency preference laws of W.S.

16-6-101

through

16-6-121

,

16-6-201

through

16-6-206

,

16-6-701

through

16-6-708

and

16-6-1001

.

Each agency and the University of Wyoming are authorized to determine the qualifications and responsibilities of bidders or respondents for capital construction projects but shall reject any bid with improper or missing signatures or bids that lack legible numerical values. Each agency and the university may:

Reject any or all bids based on the qualifications and responsibilities of bidders and respondents and readvertise for bids or responses;

Waive informalities or irregularities in any bid.

No contract shall be divided for the purpose of avoiding the requirements of this section.

History.

2020 ch. 29, § 1, effective October 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "9-23-101" for "9-2-1027" and "9-23-107" for "9-2-1033" in (a).

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 29, § 5, provides: “(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this act is effective October 1, 2020.

“(b) Sections 3 and 5 of this act are effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.” Approved March 10, 2020.